Arkansas statutes. Title 11 Labor and Industrial Relations
Chapter 9 Workers' Compensation
11-9-813. Deductibles.

Upon approval by the Insurance Commissioner, and following the adoption of such rules as the Insurance Commissioner deems necessary and advisable, each insurer issuing a policy under this chapter shall offer, as a part of the policy or as an optional endorsement to the policy, deductibles optional to the policyholder for benefits payable under this chapter.

Deductible amounts offered shall be fully disclosed to the prospective policyholder in writing in the amount of one hundred dollars ($100), two hundred dollars ($200), three hundred dollars ($300), four hundred dollars ($400), and five hundred dollars ($500), or increments of five hundred dollars ($500), up to a maximum of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) per compensable claim, or in such other amounts as may be set by the Insurance Commissioner.

The policyholder exercising the deductible option shall choose only one (1) deductible amount.

Optional deductibles shall be offered in each policy insuring liability for workers' compensation that is issued, delivered, issued for delivery, or renewed under this chapter on or after approval by the Insurance Commissioner, unless an insured employer and insurer agree to renegotiate a workers' compensation policy in effect on that date so as to include a provision allowing for a deductible.

If the policyholder exercises the option and chooses a deductible, the insured employer shall be liable for the amount of the deductible for benefits paid for each compensable claim of work injury suffered by an employee.

The insurer shall pay all or part of the deductible amount, whichever is applicable to a compensable claim, to the person or medical provider entitled to the benefits conferred by this chapter and then seek reimbursement from the insured employer for the applicable deductible amount.

The payment or nonpayment of deductible amounts by the insured employer to the insurer shall be treated under the policy insuring the liability for workers' compensation in the same manner as payment or nonpayment of premiums.

If the Insurance Commissioner determines it to be feasible, and under such rules as he or she may adopt, premium reduction for deductibles may be determined before the application of any experience modification, premium surcharge, or premium discounts, and, to the extent that an employer's experience rating or safety record is based on benefits paid, money paid by the insured employer under a deductible as provided in this section may not be included as benefits paid so as to harm the experience rating of the employer.

This section shall not apply to employers who are approved to self-insure against liability for workers' compensation or group self-insurance funds for workers' compensation.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 796, § 34; 2019, No. 315, §§ 799, 800.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2001, No. 1757, § 9, provided in part:

“Nothing in the act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001, nor in Act 1552 of 1999 shall impliedly repeal any part of Act 796 of 1993. Act 796 of 1993 is expressly reaffirmed by this act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001.”

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (a)(1) and (d).

Subchapter 9
— Workers' Compensation Private Sector Self-Insurer Guaranty Funds

A.C.R.C. Notes.

References to “this chapter” in subchapters 1-8 may not apply to subchapter 9, which was enacted subsequently.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1993, No. 452, § 5: Mar. 10, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “An emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1995, No. 825, § 14: Mar. 29, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that many of the small business operators of the state of Arkansas are currently being forced to pay excessive rates to provide workers compensation insurance for their employees and that the immediate passage of this act is necessary to grant them relief and to continue coverage for their employees. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect on and after its passage.”

11-9-901. Creation — Exemption.

The Workers' Compensation Commission is hereby authorized to recognize two separate entities formed under the Arkansas Nonprofit Corporation Act, §§ 4-28-201 — 4-28-206 and §§ 4-28-209 — 4-28-223, to function as guaranty funds for Arkansas workers' compensation self-insurers in the private sector.

One (1) guaranty fund will be established for individual self-insurers and homogeneous self-insurer groups, as defined in § 11-9-404(a)(3)(A).

A separate guaranty fund will be established for common self-insurer groups, as defined in § 11-9-404(a)(3)(B).

The two (2) funds shall be created, funded, and administered completely independently from each other.

The assets of the two (2) funds shall remain separate for all purposes and cannot be combined, and the assets of one (1) fund shall not be utilized to satisfy the obligations of the other fund.

Public sector self-insurers are specifically exempted from the provisions of this subchapter.

As used in this subchapter, “public sector self-insurer” means a group of municipalities, a city, a county, or the state entity which directly exercises control over an employee and which pays the employee's salary.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 756, §§ 1, 8; 1993, No. 452, § 1; 1995, No. 825, § 2.

11-9-902. Rules.

The Workers' Compensation Commission shall promulgate rules to implement this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 756, § 9; 2019, No. 315, § 801.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Rules” for “Regulations” in the section heading and in the text.

11-9-903. Liability.

There shall be no liability on the part of, and no cause of action of any nature shall lie, whether at law or in equity, against any agent or employee of the two (2) corporations, their boards of directors, any Arkansas workers' compensation self-insurer, or the Workers' Compensation Commission or any of its representatives on account of any action or inaction by any of them in the administration of the workers' compensation self-insurer guaranty funds or the performance of their duties in connection therewith.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 756, § 6; 1995, No. 825, § 3.

11-9-904. Amount of fund — Assessment — Inadequacy.

Each corporation acting as the guaranty fund shall independently determine periodically the amount of money each Arkansas workers' compensation self-insurer should contribute to each fund in order to provide an adequate pool of money to pay workers' compensation benefits owed by an Arkansas self-insurer when such self-insurer fails to meet its workers' compensation benefits obligations.

The Workers' Compensation Commission shall assess all workers' compensation self-insurers in an amount determined by each corporation, and the commission shall transmit the moneys collected to each corporation to be used solely to make workers' compensation benefit payments from each fund and to defray the expenses of each fund.

At any time that a workers' compensation self-insurer guaranty fund becomes inadequate to make payments to its claimants, the balance of that fund shall be prorated equally among the claimants, and the Arkansas workers' compensation self-insurers who are members of that fund shall be assessed an amount necessary to pay the outstanding claims and expenses and to replenish that fund.

The inadequacy of one (1) fund to make payments to claimants shall have no effect on the operation of the remaining fund, nor shall the assets of the remaining fund be utilized in any manner to satisfy the claims of claimants to the fund suffering from the inadequacy.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 756, §§ 1, 3; 1995, No. 825, § 4.

11-9-905. Report to board of directors on financial condition of self-insurer.

The Workers' Compensation Commission shall report to the board of directors of each corporation when the commission has reasonable cause to believe that the payment of potential claims by an Arkansas workers' compensation self-insurer is or may be jeopardized by the existing or potential financial condition of the self-insurer. The board of directors of the corporation which has the affected self-insurer as a member shall, based upon such information as is reasonably available, report to the commission upon all matters germane to the solvency, liquidation, rehabilitation, or conservation of any workers' compensation self-insurer, and such reports shall not be deemed public documents under the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101 et seq., or any other law.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 756, § 5; 1995, No. 825, § 5.

11-9-906. Money to be vested in corporation — Annual audit.

Moneys collected by the Workers' Compensation Commission and disbursed to each corporation shall be vested in the corporation and shall not be deemed state property and shall not be subject to appropriation by the General Assembly.

Each corporation shall annually submit to an audit by an independent certified public accountant, and a copy of the audit report shall be transmitted to the commission.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 756, § 4; 1995, No. 825, § 6.

11-9-907. Investment — Use of funds.

The board of directors of each corporation shall direct the investment of moneys in each workers' compensation self-insurers guaranty fund, and all returns on the investments shall be retained in each fund. The moneys in each fund shall be used solely to compensate persons entitled to receive workers' compensation benefits from an Arkansas self-insurer which is unable to meet its workers' compensation benefits obligations and to defray the expenses of each fund.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 756, § 4; 1995, No. 825, § 7.

11-9-908. Subrogation.

Each corporation shall have full rights of subrogation against any source of payment or reimbursement for payments made by the corporation on behalf of an Arkansas workers' compensation self-insurer.

Each corporation shall have a right of recovery through the maintenance of an action against any third party, other than a coemployee, who is in any way responsible or liable for injury or death to a covered worker.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 756, § 4; 1995, No. 825, § 8.

11-9-909. Action against self-insurer.

Each corporation is also authorized to take all necessary action, including bringing an action at law or in equity, to seek any available relief as against any workers' compensation self-insurer, whether the self-insurer has paid all assessments levied by the Workers' Compensation Commission on behalf of the corporation.

If a corporation is required to bring an action at law or in equity to enforce any obligations, rights, or duties as regards a workers' compensation self-insurer, the court may award reasonable attorney's fees and costs to that corporation.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 756, § 4; 1995, No. 825, § 9.

11-9-910. Private sector participants.

All private sector participants in the Arkansas workers' compensation self-insurers' program may be members of one (1) of the corporations acting as guaranty funds, and the Workers' Compensation Commission may revoke any such self-insurer's authority to act as a workers' compensation self-insurer if the self-insurer fails to maintain membership in the applicable corporation or fails to pay the assessments levied by the commission under this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 756, § 7; 1995, No. 825, § 10.

11-9-911. Termination of self-insurer status — Liability.

Any person or entity whose workers' compensation self-insurer status is terminated shall thereafter be subject to no further assessments by the Workers' Compensation Commission, but shall remain liable for all assessments due prior to the date of termination.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 756, § 2.

Subchapter 10
— Revision of Workers' Compensation Laws

A.C.R.C. Notes.

References to “this chapter” in subchapters 1-8 may not apply to subchapter 10, which was enacted subsequently.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1993, No. 796, § 38, provided:

“All provisions of this act of a general and permanent nature are amendatory to the Arkansas Code of 1987 Annotated and the Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall incorporate the same in the code specifically including Section 35.”

Effective Dates.

Acts 1993, No. 796, § 41: July 1, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the Workers' Compensation Law is in immediate need of substantial revision; that this act accomplishes immediate revision; and that this act shall go into effect as soon as is practical which is determined to be July 1, 1993; and that unless this emergency clause is adopted, this act will not go into effect until after July 1, 1993. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1993. Furthermore, the provisions of this act shall apply only to injuries which occur after July 1, 1993.”

11-9-1001. Legislative declaration.

The Seventy-Ninth General Assembly realizes that the Arkansas workers' compensation statutes must be revised and amended from time to time. Unfortunately, many of the changes made by this act were necessary because administrative law judges, the Workers' Compensation Commission, and the Arkansas courts have continually broadened the scope and eroded the purpose of the workers' compensation statutes of this state. The Seventy-Ninth General Assembly intends to restate that the major and controlling purpose of workers' compensation is to pay timely temporary and permanent disability benefits to all legitimately injured workers that suffer an injury or disease arising out of and in the course of their employment, to pay reasonable and necessary medical expenses resulting therefrom, and then to return the worker to the work force. When, and if, the workers' compensation statutes of this state need to be changed, the General Assembly acknowledges its responsibility to do so. It is the specific intent of the Seventy-Ninth General Assembly to repeal, annul, and hold for naught all prior opinions or decisions of any administrative law judge, the Workers' Compensation Commission, or courts of this state contrary to or in conflict with any provision in this act. In the future, if such things as the statute of limitations, the standard of review by the Workers' Compensation Commission or courts, the extent to which any physical condition, injury, or disease should be excluded from or added to coverage by the law, or the scope of the workers' compensation statutes need to be liberalized, broadened, or narrowed, those things shall be addressed by the General Assembly and should not be done by administrative law judges, the Workers' Compensation Commission, or the courts.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 796, § 35.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 1993, No. 796, § 38, provided:

“All provisions of this act of a general and permanent nature are amendatory to the Arkansas Code of 1987 Annotated and the Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall incorporate the same in the code specifically including Section 35.”

Acts 2001, No. 1757, § 9, provided in part:

“Nothing in the act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001, nor in Act 1552 of 1999 shall impliedly repeal any part of Act 796 of 1993. Act 796 of 1993 is expressly reaffirmed by this act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001.”

Meaning of “this act”.

Acts 1993, No. 796, also codified as § 11-9-101, § 11-9-102, §§ 11-9-105 — 11-9-107, § 11-9-109, § 11-9-113, § 11-9-114, § 11-9-401, § 11-9-402, § 11-9-406, §§ 11-9-408 — 11-9-411, § 11-9-501, § 11-9-503, § 11-9-505, § 11-9-506, § 11-9-508, § 11-9-514, § 11-9-516, § 11-9-519, § 11-9-521, § 11-9-522, § 11-9-527, § 11-9-529, §§ 11-9-702 — 11-9-705, § 11-9-707, § 11-9-713, § 11-9-717, § 11-9-802, § 11-9-805, and § 11-9-813.